Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6404
State building code; applicability.

(1) For purposes of the Building Construction Act:

(a) Component means a portion of the state building code created pursuant to section 71-6403; and

(b) Radon resistant new construction has the same meaning as in section 76-3503.

(2) The state building code shall be the building and construction standard within the state and shall be applicable:

(a) To all buildings and structures owned by the state or any state agency;

(b) In each county, city, or village which elects to adopt the state building code as its local building or construction code pursuant to section 71-6406; and

(c) In each county, city, or village which has not adopted a local building or construction code pursuant to section 71-6406 within two years after an update to the state building code.

Laws 1987, LB 227, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 319, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB799, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 213;

Laws 2019, LB96, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB130, § 2.